Utah statutes.
31A-37-103.   Chapter exclusivity.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) or otherwise provided in this chapter, a provision of this title other than this chapter does not apply to a captive insurance company.

(2)  In addition to this chapter, and subject to Section 31A-37a-103:

(a)  Chapter 37a, Special Purpose Financial Captive Insurance Company Act, applies to a special purpose financial captive insurance company; and

(b)  for purposes of a special purpose financial captive insurance company, a reference in this chapter to "this chapter" includes a reference to Chapter 37a.

